Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 776. TEXAS INVASIVE SPECIES COORDINATING COMMITTEE

Sec. 776.001. DEFINITIONS.In this chapter:

(1) "Committee" means the Texas Invasive Species Coordinating Committee.

(2) "Invasive species" means a species that is not native to an ecosystem and whose introduction to the ecosystem causes or has been demonstrated to cause economic harm, environmental harm, or harm to human health. Humans, domestic and exotic livestock, and non-harmful exotic organisms are not invasive species.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 776.002. MEMBER AGENCIES. (a) The member agencies of the committee are:

(1) the Department of Agriculture;

(2) the Parks and Wildlife Department;

(3) the State Soil and Water Conservation Board;

(4) the Texas AgriLife Extension Service;

(5) the Texas Forest Service;

(6) the Texas Water Development Board; and

(7) any other state agency added to the committee under Subsection (b).

(b) On the request of a state agency that has an interest in controlling invasive species, the member agencies listed in Subsections (a)(1)-(6) by unanimous agreement may add the agency to the committee.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 776.003. REPRESENTATIVES. (a) The committee is composed of one representative of each member agency. If an agency's representative is unable to attend a committee meeting or otherwise perform the representative's duties, the agency's alternate representative shall serve in the representative's place.

(b) The administrative head of each member agency:

(1) shall designate one individual to serve as the agency's representative on the committee and one individual to serve as alternate representative;

(2) may change the designated representative or alternate representative at will; and

(3) after designating or changing the representative or alternate representative, shall promptly notify the committee in writing of the name and position of the new representative or alternate representative.

(c) Service on the committee by a state officer or employee is an additional duty of the representative's office or employment.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 776.004. DUTIES.

(a) The committee shall:

(1) facilitate the exchange of information so that each member agency is informed of committee plans, recommendations, and proposals for research, education, and implementation of activities to:

(A) prevent, detect, assess, monitor, contain, and control or eradicate invasive species; and

(B) reduce environmental and economic threats and threats to human health from invasive species; and

(2) provide a forum for developing coordinated interagency strategies and policies for invasive species control.

(a-1) The committee may:

(1) serve as a catalyst for cooperation between state agencies in the area of invasive species control;

(2) facilitate governmental efforts, including efforts of local governments and special districts, to prevent and manage invasive species;

(3) make recommendations to state agencies regarding research, technology transfer, and management actions related to invasive species control;

(4) provide technical information and input to regional and national invasive species control coordination efforts, including the National Invasive Species Management Plan;

(5) facilitate the review of committee technical decisions and work product by specialists and interested persons; and

(6) report as needed to the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives on committee plans, work product, and accomplishments.

(b) Each member agency of the committee shall:

(1) coordinate the agency's invasive species control activities with the committee and relevant coordinating bodies, including the National Invasive Species Council;

(2) share with the committee the agency's technical expertise related to invasive species;

(3) advise the committee of known invasive species threats to natural and agricultural resources; and

(4) cooperate, to the extent allowed by law, in initiatives to obtain appropriations and grants for invasive species control.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 358 (S.B. 1424), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 776.005. BYLAWS. (a) The committee shall adopt bylaws governing the committee's operations.

(b) The bylaws:

(1) must provide a procedure to periodically elect one representative as committee chair;

(2) must provide a procedure to call committee meetings;

(3) must require the committee to meet at least annually; and

(4) may provide for the creation of subcommittees and advisory committees.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 776.0051. MEETINGS. (a) The committee shall meet at least annually at the call of the committee chair or the State Soil and Water Conservation Board's representative on the committee.

(b) The State Soil and Water Conservation Board shall ensure the committee meets at least annually.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 358 (S.B. 1424), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 776.006. STAFF; ATTACHMENT. (a) The committee is administratively attached to the State Soil and Water Conservation Board.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 358 (S.B. 1424), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2023.

(c) The State Soil and Water Conservation Board may accept and administer conditional or other loans, grants, gifts, or other funds from the state or federal government or other sources to carry out its functions under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (H.B. 1808), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 358 (S.B. 1424), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 776.007. SUNSET PROVISION. (a) The committee is subject to Chapter 325 (Texas Sunset Act).

(b) To the extent that Chapter 325 (Texas Sunset Act) places a duty on a state agency subject to review under that chapter, the State Soil and Water Conservation Board shall perform the duty as it relates to the committee.

(c) The committee shall be reviewed during each period in which the State Soil and Water Conservation Board is reviewed.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 865), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (S.B. 652), Sec. 6.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 1675), Sec. 4.01, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 596 (S.B. 619), Sec. 2.03, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 358 (S.B. 1424), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2023.